Utah statutes.
61-1-18.4.   Fees collected by division.
The Division of Securities shall establish, charge, and collect fees pursuant
to Section 63J-1-504, except when it can be demonstrated that the fee amount
should be based on factors other than cost, for the following:
(1)  the fair and reasonable cost of any examination, audit, or investigation
authorized or required by this chapter or other state law;
(2)  certificate of serving and mailing process served upon the division in
any action or proceeding commenced or prosecuted in this state against any
person who has appointed the division its agent as provided in Subsection
61-1-26(7); and
(3)  copies and authentication of all papers, publications, data, and other
records available to the public or issued under the division's authority.
